Hawaii statutes.
§334-133 Petition for additional period [of]
treatment; hearing. (a) Prior to the expiration of the period of assisted
community treatment ordered by the family court, any interested party may file
a petition with the family court for an order of continued assisted community
treatment. The petition shall be filed and notice provided in the same manner
as under sections 334-123 and 334-125.

(b) The family court shall hold a hearing on
the petition and make its decision in the same manner as provided under
sections 334-123 to 334-127. The family court may order the continued assisted
community treatment for not more than one year after the date of the hearing
pursuant to this section if the court finds that the criteria for assisted
community treatment continue to exist and are likely to continue beyond one
hundred eighty days.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the
subject's stipulation to the continuance [of] an existing court order. This
section shall be in addition to the provisions on the objection to discharge. [L
1984, c 251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §§19, 24; am L 2016, c 114, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next